Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.290

Court files accessible to reporter.

Official reporters or reporters pro tempore may, without order of court, upon giving a proper receipt therefor, procure at all reasonable hours from the office of the clerk of the court, any files or exhibits necessary for use in the preparation of statements of fact or transcribing portions of testimony or proceedings in any cause reported by them.

[ 1913 c 126 s 10; RRS s 42-10.]